Utah statutes.
36-12-3.   Interim committees -- Membership -- Purpose -- Meetings and rules.

(1)  There are hereby created interim committees of the Legislature consisting of the members of each house.  The speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint the members from the House of Representatives and the president of the Senate shall appoint the members from the Senate, each taking into consideration suggestions from the minority party in their respective house.

(2)  The purpose of the committees is to investigate and study matters of legislative concern in the interval between general legislative sessions.

(3)  The interim committees shall meet after adjournment sine die of each general session to organize and to plan study programs.  Each committee shall operate under rules established by the Legislature.



Amended by Chapter 39, 2002 General Session

